Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6311.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "Detour" means directing pedestrians to the opposite side of the street via marked crosswalks because a same side reroute is not feasible.(2) "Hospital" has the same meaning as in RCW 70.41.020.(3) "Hospital impact zone" means any public right-of-way within 300 feet from the border of the hospital property consistent with hospital use.(4) "Local government" means any Washington city, town, county, special purpose district, authority, instrumentality, or other local municipal or interlocal entity created pursuant to Washington law.(5) "Permittee" means a person who is authorized by a permit issued consistent with this chapter to perform work within the zones identified in section 2(1) of this act.(6) "Permitting authority" means any state agency or local government authorized to regulate access to public right-of-way.(7) "Public park impact zone" means any public right-of-way within 300 feet from the border of the public park property consistent with active park use.(8) "Public right-of-way" means any sidewalk, walkway, curb ramp, crosswalk, roadway shoulder, or other publicly accessible pedestrian facility.(9) "Reroute" means maintaining pedestrian flow on the same side of the street by shifting the path using temporary facilities or barriers.(10) "School speed zone" has the same meaning as described in RCW 46.61.440 (1) and (2).(11) "School walk zone" has the same meaning as in RCW 46.63.210.(12) "Temporary pedestrian route" means a protected, accessible pedestrian pathway designed to maintain passage around or through a work zone.(13) "Work zone" means an area of the public right-of-way affected by construction, maintenance, repair, utility installation, excavation, scaffolding, painting, or any similar activity requiring a permit.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. (1) Any permittee performing work within the following zones, and where pedestrian passage already exists in those zones, shall maintain continuous and accessible pedestrian passage throughout the duration of the work:(a) Hospital impact zones;(b) Public park impact zones;(c) School speed zones during school days as defined in RCW 28A.150.203; and(d) School walk zones during school days as defined in RCW 28A.150.203.(2) Sidewalk closures are prohibited in the zones identified in subsection (1) of this section unless the permittee demonstrates that:(a) No feasible same side temporary pedestrian route is possible; and(b) No practical method exists to maintain passage using temporary barriers, decking, scaffolding, or protective structures.(3) In order to meet the requirements under subsection (1) of this section, a temporary pedestrian route on the same side of the street must be provided unless it is demonstrated to be infeasible.(4) A detour to the opposite side of the street may be used only when:(a) A reroute under subsection (3) of this section is infeasible; and(b) The detour route provides accessible curb ramps and marked crossings that meet the Americans with disabilities act design standards.(5) For construction in hospital impact zones, the permittee must coordinate with the hospital to:(a) Keep emergency department entrances unobstructed;(b) Ensure ambulance routes and drop-off zones remain accessible; and(c) Prevent construction activities from blocking or restricting emergency staff circulation.(6) For the purposes of this section, local agencies shall have the authority to make determinations using clear and objective standards regarding feasibility as cited throughout this section.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. (1) Temporary pedestrian routes must meet the following standards:(a) Continuous smooth surface;(b) Compliance with Americans with disabilities act standards for curb ramp width, running slope, cross-slope, grade breaks, clear area, landing, and side treatments;(c) Compliance with Americans with disabilities act standards for accessible signs in advance of decision points, surface, continuous clear width, curb ramp or blended transition, and detectable edging of channelizing devices;(d) Physical separation from vehicle traffic using approved barriers; and(e) Adequate pedestrian scale lighting for nighttime or low-visibility conditions.(2) Construction materials, debris, equipment, and vehicles must not obstruct temporary pedestrian routes or hospital entrances.(3) The permittee shall maintain all temporary pedestrian facilities in working condition at all times.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. (1) A permittee must submit to the permitting authority a pedestrian access safety plan for any work occurring within a zone described in section 2(1) of this act.(2) The pedestrian access safety plan must include:(a) Location maps showing reroutes, detours, barriers, and signage;(b) Accessibility analysis for persons with disabilities; and(c) A plan for maintaining unobstructed emergency access.(3) For projects in hospital impact zones, the pedestrian access safety plan must include coordination procedures with hospital transportation, security, and emergency departments if the work is being permitted for a hospital impact zone.(4) The permitting authority may require revisions to the pedestrian access safety plan before issuing a permit.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5. (1) The permitting authority may inspect any work zone to ensure compliance with this chapter.(2) If the permittee fails to comply, the permitting authority shall provide notice and an opportunity to correct the issue of not more than 24 hours. If the permittee fails to achieve compliance within the identified period, then:(a) A stop work order may be issued;(b) Civil penalties may be assessed;(c) Temporary pedestrian facility routes may be ordered corrected or replaced; and(d) The local government may not be held liable for damages or injury incurred as a result of any lack of compliance.(3) Repeated violations may result in permit revocation.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6. The department shall adopt rules to implement this chapter, including design standards for pedestrian reroutes and detours in zones described in section 2(1) of this act.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 7. This chapter applies to:(1) The department;(2) Local governments that have not adopted standards for pedestrian reroutes and detours in construction zones as of the effective date of this section; and(3) All public or private entities performing work requiring right-of-way permits within zones described in section 2(1) of this act.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8. A new section is added to chapter 35.68 RCW to read as follows:A city or town must comply with the requirements of chapter 47.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 11 of this act) when permitting any work occurring within a zone described in section 2(1) of this act.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 9. A new section is added to chapter 35A.21 RCW to read as follows:A code city must comply with the requirements of chapter 47.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 11 of this act) when permitting any work occurring within a zone described in section 2(1) of this act.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 10. A new section is added to chapter 36.01 RCW to read as follows:A county must comply with the requirements of chapter 47.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 11 of this act) when permitting any work occurring within a zone described in section 2(1) of this act.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 11. Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 47 RCW.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 12. This act takes effect January 1, 2027.--- END ---